Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB248.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 247.4477 is amended to read as follows:
In the event a majority of the producers eligible for participation in the referendum and
voting therein shall vote in favor of the assessment, then, upon the written request of the
duly certified commission, council, board, association, or other agency of producers of
the agricultural commodity, the Commissioner shall notify forthwith, by certified mail,
all persons engaged in the business of purchasing the agricultural commodities in this
state, that on and after the date specified in the letter, the specified assessment shall be
deducted from the producer's payment by the purchaser, or his or her agent or
representative, from the purchase price of the agricultural commodity. The assessment so
deducted shall be remitted by the purchaser to the duly certified commission, council,
board, association, or other agency of the producers entitled to it on or before the final
day of the month following the end of the month in which the commodity is sold to the
purchaser. The funds, including donations from individuals, concerns, corporations, and
grants from the state or governmental agencies, shall be used for the purpose of
promoting and stimulating, through educational and applied research programs, the
increased production of the agricultural commodity. The books and records of all the
purchasers of the agricultural commodity shall at all times during regular business hours
be open for inspection by the Commissioner of Agriculture or his or her duly authorized
agents.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/24/2026 2:40 PM Jacketed